Illinois, session 104th, SB1850.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 524A-5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/24A-5)  (from Ch. 122, par. 24A-5)7    Sec. 24A-5. Content of evaluation plans. This Section does 8not apply to teachers assigned to schools identified in an 9agreement entered into between the board of a school district 10operating under Article 34 of this Code and the exclusive 11representative of the district's teachers in accordance with 12Section 34-85c of this Code. 13    Each school district to which this Article applies shall 14establish a teacher evaluation plan which ensures that each 15teacher in contractual continued service is evaluated at least 16once in the course of every 2 or 3 school years as provided in 17this Section.18    Each school district shall establish a teacher evaluation 19plan that ensures that:20        (1) each teacher not in contractual continued service 21    is evaluated at least once every school year; and22        (2) except as otherwise provided in this Section, each 23    teacher in contractual continued service is evaluated at   SB1850- 2 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    least once in the course of every 2 school years. However, 2    any teacher in contractual continued service whose 3    performance is rated as either "needs improvement" or 4    "unsatisfactory" must be evaluated at least once in the 5    school year following the receipt of such rating.6    No later than September 1, 2022, each school district must 7establish a teacher evaluation plan that ensures that each 8teacher in contractual continued service whose performance is 9rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" is evaluated at 10least once in the course of the 3 school years after receipt of 11the rating and implement an informal teacher observation plan 12established by agency rule and by agreement of the joint 13committee established under subsection (b) of Section 24A-4 of 14this Code that ensures that each teacher in contractual 15continued service whose performance is rated as either 16"excellent" or "proficient" is informally observed at least 17once in the course of the 2 school years after receipt of the 18rating. 19    For the 2022-2023 school year only, if the Governor has 20declared a disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant 21to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, 22a school district may waive the evaluation requirement of all 23teachers in contractual continued service whose performances 24were rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" during the 25last school year in which the teachers were evaluated under 26this Section.  SB1850- 3 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 2or any other Section of this Code, a principal shall not be 3prohibited from evaluating any teachers within a school during 4his or her first year as principal of such school. If a 5first-year principal exercises this option in a school 6district where the evaluation plan provides for a teacher in 7contractual continued service to be evaluated once in the 8course of every 2 or 3 school years, as applicable, then a new 92-year or 3-year evaluation plan must be established. 10    For teachers not in contractual continued service who 11participate in a new teacher induction and mentoring program 12established by the school district in which they are employed, 13non-evaluative mentor observation and feedback may be used in 14place of one evaluation observation.15    The evaluation plan shall comply with the requirements of 16this Section and of any rules adopted by the State Board of 17Education pursuant to this Section.18    The plan shall include a description of each teacher's 19duties and responsibilities and of the standards to which that 20teacher is expected to conform, and shall include at least the 21following components:22        (a) personal observation of the teacher in the 23    classroom by the evaluator, unless the teacher has no 24    classroom duties.25        (b) consideration of the teacher's attendance, 26    planning, instructional methods, classroom management,   SB1850- 4 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    where relevant, and competency in the subject matter 2    taught.3        (c) by no later than the applicable implementation 4    date, consideration of student growth as a significant 5    factor in the rating of the teacher's performance.6        (d) prior to September 1, 2012, rating of the 7    performance of teachers in contractual continued service 8    as either: 9            (i) "excellent", "satisfactory" or 10        "unsatisfactory"; or11            (ii) "excellent", "proficient", "needs 12        improvement" or "unsatisfactory".13        (e) on and after September 1, 2012, rating of the 14    performance of all teachers as "excellent", "proficient", 15    "needs improvement" or "unsatisfactory".16        (f) specification as to the teacher's strengths and 17    weaknesses, with supporting reasons for the comments made.18        (g) inclusion of a copy of the evaluation in the 19    teacher's personnel file and provision of a copy to the 20    teacher.21        (h) within 30 school days after the completion of an 22    evaluation rating a teacher in contractual continued 23    service as "needs improvement", development by the 24    evaluator, in consultation with the teacher, and taking 25    into account the teacher's ongoing on-going professional 26    responsibilities including his or her regular teaching   SB1850- 5 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    assignments, of a professional development plan directed 2    to the areas that need improvement and any supports that 3    the district will provide to address the areas identified 4    as needing improvement.5        (i) within 30 school days after completion of an 6    evaluation rating a teacher in contractual continued 7    service as "unsatisfactory", development and commencement 8    by the district of a remediation plan designed to correct 9    deficiencies cited, provided the deficiencies are deemed 10    remediable. In all school districts the remediation plan 11    for unsatisfactory, tenured teachers shall provide for 90 12    school days of remediation within the classroom, unless an 13    applicable collective bargaining agreement provides for a 14    shorter duration. In all school districts evaluations 15    issued pursuant to this Section shall be issued within 10 16    days after the conclusion of the respective remediation 17    plan. However, the school board or other governing 18    authority of the district shall not lose jurisdiction to 19    discharge a teacher in the event the evaluation is not 20    issued within 10 days after the conclusion of the 21    respective remediation plan.22        (j) participation in the remediation plan by the 23    teacher in contractual continued service rated 24    "unsatisfactory", an evaluator and a consulting teacher 25    selected by the evaluator of the teacher who was rated 26    "unsatisfactory", which consulting teacher is an   SB1850- 6 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    educational employee as defined in the Illinois 2    Educational Labor Relations Act, has at least 5 years' 3    teaching experience, and a reasonable familiarity with the 4    assignment of the teacher being evaluated, and who 5    received an "excellent" rating on his or her most recent 6    evaluation. Where no teachers who meet these criteria are 7    available within the district, the district shall request 8    and the applicable regional office of education shall 9    supply, to participate in the remediation process, an 10    individual who meets these criteria.11        In a district having a population of less than 500,000 12    with an exclusive bargaining agent, the bargaining agent 13    may, if it so chooses, supply a roster of qualified 14    teachers from whom the consulting teacher is to be 15    selected. That roster shall, however, contain the names of 16    at least 5 teachers, each of whom meets the criteria for 17    consulting teacher with regard to the teacher being 18    evaluated, or the names of all teachers so qualified if 19    that number is less than 5. In the event of a dispute as to 20    qualification, the State Board shall determine 21    qualification.22        (k) a mid-point and final evaluation by an evaluator 23    during and at the end of the remediation period, 24    immediately following receipt of a remediation plan 25    provided for under subsections (i) and (j) of this 26    Section. Each evaluation shall assess the teacher's   SB1850- 7 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    performance during the time period since the prior 2    evaluation; provided that the last evaluation shall also 3    include an overall evaluation of the teacher's performance 4    during the remediation period. A written copy of the 5    evaluations and ratings, in which any deficiencies in 6    performance and recommendations for correction are 7    identified, shall be provided to and discussed with the 8    teacher within 10 school days after the date of the 9    evaluation, unless an applicable collective bargaining 10    agreement provides to the contrary. These subsequent 11    evaluations shall be conducted by an evaluator. The 12    consulting teacher shall provide advice to the teacher 13    rated "unsatisfactory" on how to improve teaching skills 14    and to successfully complete the remediation plan. The 15    consulting teacher shall participate in developing the 16    remediation plan, but the final decision as to the 17    evaluation shall be done solely by the evaluator, unless 18    an applicable collective bargaining agreement provides to 19    the contrary. Evaluations at the conclusion of the 20    remediation process shall be separate and distinct from 21    the required annual evaluations of teachers and shall not 22    be subject to the guidelines and procedures relating to 23    those annual evaluations. The evaluator may but is not 24    required to use the forms provided for the annual 25    evaluation of teachers in the district's evaluation plan.26        (l) reinstatement to the evaluation schedule set forth   SB1850- 8 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    in the district's evaluation plan for any teacher in 2    contractual continued service who achieves a rating equal 3    to or better than "satisfactory" or "proficient" in the 4    school year following a rating of "needs improvement" or 5    "unsatisfactory".6        (m) dismissal in accordance with subsection (d) of 7    Section 24-12 or Section 24-16.5 or 34-85 of this Code of 8    any teacher who fails to complete any applicable 9    remediation plan with a rating equal to or better than a 10    "satisfactory" or "proficient" rating. Districts and 11    teachers subject to dismissal hearings are precluded from 12    compelling the testimony of consulting teachers at such 13    hearings under subsection (d) of Section 24-12 or Section 14    24-16.5 or 34-85 of this Code, either as to the rating 15    process or for opinions of performances by teachers under 16    remediation.17        (n) After the implementation date of an evaluation 18    system for teachers in a district as specified in Section 19    24A-2.5 of this Code, if a teacher in contractual 20    continued service successfully completes a remediation 21    plan following a rating of "unsatisfactory" in an overall 22    performance evaluation received after the foregoing 23    implementation date and receives a subsequent rating of 24    "unsatisfactory" in any of the teacher's overall 25    performance evaluation ratings received during the 26    36-month period following the teacher's completion of the   SB1850- 9 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1    remediation plan, then the school district may forgo 2    remediation and seek dismissal in accordance with 3    subsection (d) of Section 24-12 or Section 34-85 of this 4    Code. 5        (o) Teachers who are due to be evaluated in the last 6    year before they are set to retire shall be offered the 7    opportunity to waive their evaluation and to retain their 8    most recent rating, unless the teacher was last rated as 9    "needs improvement" or "unsatisfactory". The school 10    district may still reserve the right to evaluate a teacher 11    provided the district gives notice to the teacher at least 12    14 days before the evaluation and a reason for evaluating 13    the teacher. 14    Nothing in this Section or Section 24A-4 shall be 15construed as preventing immediate dismissal of a teacher for 16deficiencies which are deemed irremediable or for actions 17which are injurious to or endanger the health or person of 18students in the classroom or school, or preventing the 19dismissal or non-renewal of teachers not in contractual 20continued service for any reason not prohibited by applicable 21employment, labor, and civil rights laws. Failure to strictly 22comply with the time requirements contained in Section 24A-5 23shall not invalidate the results of the remediation plan.24    Nothing contained in Public Act 98-648 repeals, 25supersedes, invalidates, or nullifies final decisions in 26lawsuits pending on July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public   SB1850- 10 -LRB104 03472 LNS 13495 b1Act 98-648) in Illinois courts involving the interpretation of 2Public Act 97-8. 3    If the Governor has declared a disaster due to a public 4health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois 5Emergency Management Agency Act that suspends in-person 6instruction, the timelines in this Section connected to the 7commencement and completion of any remediation plan are 8waived. Except if the parties mutually agree otherwise and the 9agreement is in writing, any remediation plan that had been in 10place for more than 45 days prior to the suspension of 11in-person instruction shall resume when in-person instruction 12resumes and any remediation plan that had been in place for 13fewer than 45 days prior to the suspension of in-person 14instruction shall be discontinued and a new remediation period 15shall begin when in-person instruction resumes. The 16requirements of this paragraph apply regardless of whether 17they are included in a school district's teacher evaluation 18plan. 19(Source: P.A. 102-252, eff. 1-1-22; 102-729, eff. 5-6-22; 20103-85, eff. 6-9-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-8-24.)